California, session 20252026, AB1001.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13198.4 of the Water Code is amended to read:13198.4. (a) This section applies and is subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or another statute to an implementing agency to provide grants and direct expenditures for interim or immediate relief to drought scenarios.(b) An implementing agency may provide grant funds and direct expenditures to or on behalf of affected public and private entities to provide interim or immediate relief.(c) Notwithstanding Section 11019 of the Government Code, an implementing agency may provide advance payment of up to 25 percent of grant funds awarded to public agencies, nonprofit organizations, public utilities, mobilehome parks, mutual water companies, farmers and ranchers, federally recognized California Native American tribes, nonfederally recognized Native American tribes on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission for the purposes of Chapter 905 of the Statutes of 2004, administrators, and groundwater sustainability agencies that have demonstrated cashflow problems according to the satisfaction of the implementing agency.(d) An implementing agency may authorize funding of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) without a written agreement.